Utah statutes.
53C-3-105.    Disposition of revenue for normal schools.
Money distributed for the benefit of the state's normal schools, as provided
under the Utah Enabling Act, Section 12, Utah Constitution Article X, Section
7, Utah Constitution Article XX, Section 2, and Sections 53C-3-101 and
53C-3-103, shall be allocated to institutions within the state system of
higher education, as defined in Section 53B-1-102, that offer bachelor's
degrees in education in proportion to the number of bachelor's degrees awarded
by those institutions in the previous fiscal year.
